Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2605
Assistive device lessor, defined.

Assistive device lessor means a person who leases an assistive device to a consumer under a written lease or who holds the lessor's rights under a written lease.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 5.